Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202379-2,158
Dress code and grooming policy; school board; adopt; enforcement; requirements.

(1) On or before July 1, 2025, the school board of each school district shall adopt a written dress code and grooming policy to be implemented at the start of the 2025-26 school year that is consistent with the model policy developed by the State Department of Education in accordance with section 79-2,159 and may include any other procedures and provisions the school board deems appropriate.

(2) Enforcement of violations of the written dress code and grooming policy shall:

(a) Be treated as minor on the continuum of school rule violations and shall not constitute student conduct subject to long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment as provided in section 79-267;

(b) Not require the student to miss substantial classroom time, instruction time, or school activities; and

(c) Not, under any circumstance, allow an administrator, teacher, other member of the staff, or contractor to permanently or temporarily alter or cut a student's hair.

(3) No student shall be disproportionately affected by a dress code or grooming policy enforcement because of the student's gender, race, color, religion, disability, or national origin.

Laws 2023, LB298, § 2.